Idaho, session 2025, S1067.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
recognize that computation is a form of personal expression, and as such
takes on the protections and responsibilities of free speech. Furthermore,
artificial intelligence (AI) inference models, training data, algorithms,
and supporting parameters are recognized as an extension of human thought
and creativity, subject to the same protections and responsibilities of
free speech. The development and refinement of AI systems must be free from
excessive regulation, allowing for innovation and improvement through dis-
tributed continuous iteration and experimentation.
SECTION 2. That Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 98, Title 67, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 98
LIMITATIONS ON REGULATION OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
67-9801. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI" means a form of algorithmic com-
putation that is an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its
level of autonomy and can, in response to explicit or implicit objectives,
infer or otherwise algorithmically determine from the input it receives how
to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.
(2) "Computation" means machine-based algorithmic data processing or
manipulation.
(3) "General purpose technology" means a foundational engineered or
machine-based system without explicit use case, but that provides a founda-
tional component enabling a broad variety of complementary technologies and
potential applications.
(4) "Governmental entity" means and includes the state and political
subdivisions as defined in this section.
(5) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, municipal corpora-
tion, health district, school district, or any other political subdivision
or public corporation.
(6) "State" means the state of Idaho or any office, department, agency,
authority, commission, board, institution, college, university, or other
instrumentality thereof.


67-9802. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE REGULATION LIMITATIONS. (1) No gov-
ernmental entity may enact or enforce any law or ordinance that has the ex-
press or practical effect of constraining the development, training, or use
of artificial intelligence, including but not limited to:
(a) Regulating research and development;
(b) Deployment in commercial applications; and
(c) Consumer use of AI technologies.
(2) No governmental entity may regulate the operation of an AI system's
underlying algorithms or decision making processes.
(3) AI technologies shall be classified as general purpose technology
for regulatory purposes, subject to all requirements applicable thereto.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.